Massachusetts, session 194th, H3010.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended in
paragraph (a) of Subsection B by adding the following subparagraph:-
(21) Any amount received as part of the Segal AmeriCorps Education Award, as
stipulated in subtitle D of title I of the National and Community Service Act of 1990. The Segal
AmeriCorps Education Award is available to individuals who complete a term of service in the
AmeriCorps program. The education award can be used to pay education costs at eligible
institutions of higher learning including technical schools, for educational training, or to repay
qualified student loans, as determined eligible by the federal government.
SECTION 2. This law shall become effective 180 days after its passage.
of 1